California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Whenever any tax, interest, or penalty is not paid when due, the board may file in the office of the County Clerk of Sacramento County or any other county a certificate specifying the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty due, the name and last known address of the taxpayer liable for it, that the board has complied with all the provisions of this part in relation to the computation and levy of the tax, and requesting that judgment be entered against the taxpayer in the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty set forth in the certificate. The county clerk immediately upon the filing of the certificate shall enter a judgment for the people of the State of California
 against the taxpayer in the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty set forth in the certificate. The judgment may be filed by the county clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled “Special Judgment for State Excise Tax.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32362.

An abstract or copy of the judgment entered under Section 32361 may be recorded with the county recorder of any county, and from the time of such recording, the amount of the taxes, interest, and penalty set forth in the judgment shall constitute a lien upon all the real property owned by the taxpayer in the county or which he may acquire afterwards and before the lien expires, which lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the time of the recording of the abstract unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the date of the recording of the abstract or within 10 years
 from the date of the last extension of the lien, be extended by recording a new abstract in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of such recording, the lien shall be extended to the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. Execution shall issue upon such a judgment upon the request of the board in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments, and sales shall be held under the execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure. In all proceedings under this section the board shall act on behalf of the people of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

32363.

(a) If any person fails to pay any amount imposed under this part at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, including penalties and interest, together with any costs in addition thereto, shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. Such a lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. 

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts
 disclosed on a return received by the board before the date the return is delinquent, the date the return would have been delinquent;

(2) For amounts disclosed on a return filed on or after the date the return is delinquent, the date the return is received by the board;

(3) For amounts determined under Section 32311 (pertaining to jeopardy assessments), the date the notice of the board’s finding is mailed or issued;

(4) For all other amounts, the date the assessment is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

32364.

(a) If the board determines that the amount of tax, interest, and penalties are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property or that the release or subordination of the lien imposed under this article will not jeopardize the collection of the amount of the tax, interest, and penalties, the board may at any time release all or any portion of the property subject to the lien from the lien or may subordinate the lien to other liens and encumbrances.

(b) If the board
 finds that the liability represented by the lien imposed under this article, including any interest accrued thereon, is legally unenforceable, the board may release the lien.

(c) A certificate by the board to the effect that any property has been released from a lien or that the lien has been subordinated to other liens and encumbrances is conclusive evidence that the property has been released or that the lien has been subordinated as provided in the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 628.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Warrant for Collection [32365. - 32367.]

32365.

At any time within three years after any person is delinquent in the payment of any amount herein required to be paid, or within 10 years after the last recording of an abstract under Section 32362 or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, the board or its authorized representative may issue a warrant for the enforcement of any liens and for the collection of any amount required to be paid to the state under this part. The warrant shall be directed to any sheriff or marshal and shall have the
 same effect as a writ of execution. The warrant shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same effect as a levy of and a sale pursuant to a writ of execution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 155.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32366.

The board may pay or advance to the sheriff or marshal, the same fees, commissions, and expenses for his or her services as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution. The board, and not the court, shall approve the fees for publication in a newspaper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32367.

The fees, commissions, and expenses are the obligation of the person required to pay any amount under this part and may be collected from him by virtue of the warrant or in any other manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 809.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Seizure and Sale [32371. - 32374.]

32371.

Whenever any taxpayer is delinquent in the payment of the tax, the board or its authorized representative may seize any property, real or personal, of the taxpayer, and sell at public auction the property seized, or a sufficient portion thereof, to pay the tax due, together with any penalties imposed for the delinquency and all costs that have been incurred on account of the seizure and sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32372.

Notice of the sale, and the time and place thereof, shall be given to the delinquent taxpayer and to all persons who have an interest of record in the property at least 20 days before the date set for the sale in the following manner: The notice shall be personally served or enclosed in an envelope addressed to the taxpayer or other person at his or her last known residence or place of business in this state. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city in which the property or a part thereof is situated if any part thereof is situated in a city or, if not,
 in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the property or a part thereof is located. Notice shall also be posted in both of the following manners:

(a) One public place in the city in which the interest in property is to be sold if it is to be sold in a city or, if not to be sold in a city, one public place in the county in which the interest in the property is to be sold.

(b) One conspicuous place on the property.

The notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold, a statement of the amount due, including taxes, interest, penalties, and costs, the name of the taxpayer, and the further statement that unless the amount due is paid on or before the time fixed in the notice for the sale, the property, or so much thereof as may be necessary, will be sold in accordance with law and the
 notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1528, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

32373.

At the sale the property shall be sold by the board or by its authorized agent in accordance with law and the notice, and the board shall deliver to the purchaser a bill of sale for the personal property and a deed for any real property sold. The bill of sale or deed vests title in the purchaser. The unsold portion of any property seized may be left at the place of sale at the risk of the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 170.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

32374.

If upon the sale the moneys received exceed the amount of all license taxes, penalties, and costs due the state from the taxpayer, the board shall return the excess to him or her and obtain his or her receipt. If any person having an interest in or lien upon the property files with the board prior to the sale notice of his or her interest, the board shall withhold any excess pending a determination of the rights of the respective parties to the property by a court of competent jurisdiction. If for any reason the receipt of the taxpayer is not available, the
 board shall deposit the excess moneys with the Controller, as trustee for the owner, subject to the order of the taxpayer, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 860, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Miscellaneous [32381. - 32390.]

32381.

If any taxpayer is delinquent in the payment of any obligations imposed by this part, or in the event a determination has been made against such a taxpayer which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment becomes delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording of an abstract or copy of judgment under Section 32362 or the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof, personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their
 possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the taxpayer, or owing any debts to the taxpayer. In the case of any state officer, department, or agency, the notice shall be given to such officer, department, or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

32382.

After receiving the notice the person so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires the earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

32383.

All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the board of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If such notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of such bank at which such deposit is carried or at which such credits or personal property is held. Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to a
 deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of two times the amount, interest and penalty due from the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

32384.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid he shall be liable to the State for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of such transfer or disposition the State is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

32385.

The remedies of the State provided for in this chapter are cumulative, and no action taken by the board or Attorney General constitutes an election by the State or any of its officers to pursue any remedy to the exclusion of any other remedy for which provision is made in this part.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 32382 by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

32386.

The amounts required to be paid by any person under this part together with interest and penalties shall be satisfied first in any of the following cases:

(a) Whenever the person is insolvent.

(b) Whenever the person makes a voluntary assignment of his assets.

(c) Whenever the estate of the person in the hands of executors, administrators, or heirs is insufficient to pay all the debts due from the deceased.

(d) Whenever the estate and effects of an absconding, concealed, or absent person required to pay any amount under this part are levied upon by process of law.

This section does not give the state a preference over a lien or security interest which was recorded or perfected prior to the time when the state records or files its lien as provided in Section 7171 of the Government Code.

The preference given to the state by this section is subordinate to the preferences given to claims for personal services by Sections 1204 and 1206 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

32387.

(a) The board may, by notice of levy served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a taxpayer or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from these credits or other personal property the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from the taxpayer or other person, or the amount of any
 liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the board at the time it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:

(1) Payments due for services of independent contractors, dividends, rents,
 royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural rights.

(2) Payments or credits due or becoming due periodically as a result of an enforceable obligation to the distributor, dealer, or other person liable for the tax.

(3) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due the distributor, dealer, or other person liable as the result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(e) In the case of a financial institution, to be effective, the notice shall state the amount due from the consumer and shall be delivered, mailed, or served by
 electronic transmission or other electronic technology, to the branch or office of the financial institution where the credits or other property is held, unless another branch or office is designated by the financial institution to receive the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 52.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

32387.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, and 706.105 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the board may serve earnings withholding orders for taxes and any other notice or document required to be served or provided in connection with an earnings withholding order for taxes according to Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to government and private employers by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(b) Upon consent of the employer, the board may provide service by electronic transmission or other electronic technology under this
 section.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 706.071, 706.073, 706.080, 706.101, 706.125, and 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the board may receive the employer’s return, as described in Section 706.126 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by electronic transmission or other electronic technology.

(d) This section shall apply in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if this section had been incorporated in full into Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section shall apply to notices served or provided on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 8.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

32387.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 7 (commencing with Section 706.151) of Chapter 5 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the board determines upon receiving information from a manufacturer or other person liable for any amount under this part that the person’s employer withheld earnings for taxes pursuant to Section 32387 and failed to remit the withheld earnings to the board, the employer shall be liable for the amount not remitted. The board’s determination shall be based on payroll documents or other substantiating
 evidence furnished by the person liable for the tax.

(b) Upon its determination, the board shall mail notice to the employer at its last known address that upon failure to remit the withheld earnings to the board within 15 days of the date of its notice to the employer, the employer shall be liable for that amount which was withheld and not remitted.

(c) If the employer fails to remit the amount withheld to the board upon notice, that amount for which the employer is liable shall be determined, collected, and paid as though it were a tax deficiency. The amount may be assessed at any time prior to seven years from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld. Interest shall accrue on that amount from the first day that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld.

(d) When the determination against the employer is final and due and payable, the person’s account shall be immediately credited with an amount equal to that determined amount as though it were a payment received by the board on the first date that the unremitted amount, in the aggregate, was first withheld by the employer.

(e) Collection against the person liable for the tax is stayed for both the following amount and period:

(1) An amount equal to the amount determined by the board under subdivision (a).

(2) The earlier of the time the credit is applied to the person’s account pursuant to subdivision (d) or the determination against the employer is withdrawn or revised and the person is notified by the board thereof.

(f) If under this
 section an amount that was withheld and not remitted to the board is final and due and payable by the employer and credited to the person’s account, this remedy shall be the exclusive remedy for the person to recover that amount from the employer.

(g) This section shall apply to determinations made by the board on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32388.

The board shall not be subject to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 16307 of the Corporations Code unless, at the time of application for or issuance of a permit, license, or registration number under this part, the applicant furnishes to the board a written partnership agreement that provides that all business assets shall be held in the name of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32389.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, enter into a written installment payment agreement with a person for the payment of any taxes due, together with interest thereon and any applicable penalties, in installments over an agreed period. With mutual consent, the board and the taxpayer may alter or modify the agreement.

(b) Upon failure of a person to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement with the board, the board may terminate the agreement by
 mailing a notice of termination to the person. The notice shall include an explanation of the basis for the termination and inform the person of his or her right to request an administrative review of the termination. Fifteen days after the mailing of the notice, the installment payment agreement shall be void, and the total amount of the tax, interest, and penalties due shall be immediately payable.

(c) The board shall establish procedures for an administrative review for persons requesting that review whose installment payment agreements are terminated under subdivision (b). The collection of taxes, interest, and penalties that are the subject of the terminated installment payment agreement may not be stayed during this administrative review process.

(d) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy.

(e) Except in the case of fraud, if an installment payment agreement is entered into within 45 days from the date on which the board’s notice of determination or redetermination becomes final, and the person complies with the terms of the installment payment agreement, the board shall relieve the penalty imposed pursuant to Section 32305.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32389.5.

The board, beginning no later than July 1, 2000, shall provide each taxpayer who has an installment payment agreement in effect under Section 32389 an annual statement setting forth the initial balance at the beginning of the year, the payments made during the year, and the remaining balance as of the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32390.

(a) A collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed on any person that fails to pay an amount of tax, interest, penalty, or other amount due and payable under this part. The collection cost recovery fee shall be in an amount less than or equal to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration’s costs for collection, as reasonably determined by the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration. The collection cost recovery fee shall be imposed only if the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has mailed its demand notice, to that person for payment, that advises that continued failure to pay the amount due may result in collection action, including the imposition of a collection cost recovery fee.

(b) Interest shall not accrue with respect to the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(c) The collection cost recovery fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be collected in the same manner as the collection of any other tax imposed by this part.

(d) (1) If the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration finds that a person’s failure to pay any amount under this part is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person shall be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee provided by this section.

(2) Any person seeking to be relieved of the collection cost recovery fee shall file with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(e) Subdivision (a)
 shall be operative with respect to a demand notice for payment which is mailed on or after January 1, 2011.

(f) Collection cost recovery fee revenues shall be deposited in the same manner as revenues derived from any other tax imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 30.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Overpayments and Refunds [32401. - 32440.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim for Refund [32401. - 32407.]

32401.

If the board determines that any amount of tax, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the board shall set forth that fact in its records and certify the amount collected in excess of what was legally due and the person from whom it was collected or by whom paid, and credit the excess amount collected or paid on any amounts then due from the person from whom the excess amount was collected or by whom it was paid under this part, and the balance shall be refunded to the person, or the person’s successors, administrators, or executors. Any determination by the board pursuant to this section with respect to an amount in excess of fifty thousand dollars
 ($50,000) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days after the effective date of that determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 9.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

32402.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) no refund shall be approved by the board after three years from the 15th day of the calendar month following the close of the period for which the overpayment was made, or, with respect to determinations made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 32271), Article 3 (commencing with Section 32291), or Article 5 (commencing with Section 32311) of Chapter 6 after six months from the date the determinations become final, or after six months from the date of overpayment, whichever period expires
 later, unless a claim therefor is filed with the board within that period. No credit shall be approved by the board after the expiration of that period unless a claim for credit is filed with the board within that period, or unless the credit relates to a period for which a waiver is given pursuant to Section 32273.

(b) A refund may be approved by the board for any period for which a waiver is given under Section 32273, if a claim therefor is filed with the board before the expiration of the period agreed upon.

(c) Every claim for refund or credit shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the claim is founded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 209.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32402.1.

(a) The limitation period specified in Section 32402 shall be suspended during any period of a person’s life that the person is financially disabled.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), a person is financially disabled if the person is unable to manage his or her financial affairs by reason of medically determinable physical or mental impairment of the person which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last
 for a continuous period of not less than 12 months. A person shall not be considered to have an impairment unless proof of the existences thereof is furnished in the form and manner as the board may require.

(2) A person shall not be treated as financially disabled during any period that the person’s spouse or any other person is authorized to act on behalf of the person in financial matters.

(c) This section applies to periods of disability commencing before, on, or after the effective date of the act adding this section, but does not apply to any claim for refund that (without regard to this section) is barred by the operation or rule of law, including res judicata, as of the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32402.2.

Notwithstanding Section 32402, a refund of an overpayment of any tax, penalty, or interest collected by the board by means of levy, through the use of liens, or by other enforcement procedures, shall be approved if a claim for a refund is filed within three years of the date of an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

32402.3.

(a) A claim for refund that is otherwise valid under Section 32402 that is made in the case in which the amount of tax determined has not been paid in full shall be deemed to be a timely filed claim for refund with respect to all subsequent payments applied to that determination.

(b) For purposes of this section, “amount of tax determined” means an amount of tax, interest, or penalty, with respect
 to a single determination made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 32271), Article 3 (commencing with Section 32291), or Article 5 (commencing with Section 32311) of Chapter 6.

(c) This section shall apply to all claims for refund on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 98, Sec. 4.   (AB 1856)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

32403.

Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the State on account of the overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32404.

Within 30 days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part, the board shall serve written notice of its action on the claimant, such service to be made as provided by Section 32271.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32405.

Interest shall be computed, allowed, and paid upon any overpayment of any amount of tax at the modified adjusted rate per month established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the 16th day of the calendar month following the period during which the overpayment was made. In addition, a refund or credit shall be made of any interest imposed upon the claimant with respect to the amount being refunded or credited.

The interest shall be paid as follows:

(a) In
 the case of a refund, to the 15th day of the calendar month following the date upon which the claimant, if he or she has not already filed a claim, is notified by the board that a claim may be filed or the date upon which the claim is approved by the board, whichever date is earlier.

(b) In the case of a credit, to the same date as that to which interest is computed on the tax or amount against which the credit is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 620, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

32406.

(a) If the board determines that any overpayment has been made intentionally or by reason of carelessness, it shall not allow any interest thereon.

(b) If any person who has filed a claim for refund requests the board to defer action on the claim, the board, as a condition to deferring action, may require the claimant to waive interest for the period during which the person requests the board to defer action on the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 420, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

32407.

(a) The State Board of Equalization shall refund without interest to the licensee the amount of the tax imposed under this part with respect to the alcoholic beverages and which has been paid by the licensee as part of his purchase price of the alcoholic beverages, when such beverages were lost, rendered unmarketable, or condemned by a duly authorized official by reason of:

(1) Fire, flood, casualty, or other disaster, or

(2) Breakage, destruction, or other damage (but not including theft) resulting from vandalism,
 malicious mischief, or insurrection if such disaster or damage occurred in this state and if such beverages were held and intended for sale at the time of such disaster or other damage. The payments provided for in this section shall be made to the person holding such beverages for sale at the time of such disaster or other damage.

(b) The State Board of Equalization may approve claims for refunds without interest under this section upon proof satisfactory to it that the alcoholic beverages were destroyed or damaged so that they could not be sold and that the licensee has not otherwise been compensated for the loss in the amount of the tax included in the purchase price paid for the alcoholic beverages. A claim for refund under this section shall be in such form and accompanied by such proof as the State Board of Equalization may require.

(c) No claim shall be allowed under this
 section unless such claim is filed within six months after the date on which such beverages were lost, rendered unmarketable, or condemned by a duly authorized official.

(d) No claim of less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) shall be allowed under this section with respect to any disaster or other damage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suit for Refund [32411. - 32418.]

32411.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this State or against any officer of the State to prevent or enjoin the collection of any tax sought to be collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32412.

No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally assessed or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32413.

Within 90 days after the mailing of the notice of the board’s action upon a claim for refund or credit, the claimant may bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount with respect to which the claim has been disallowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32414.

If the board fails to mail notice of action on a claim within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to the mailing of notice by the board, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32415.

Failure to bring suit or action within the time specified in this article constitutes a waiver of all demands against the State on account of any alleged overpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32416.

If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff, the amount of the judgment shall first be credited on any taxes due from the plaintiff, and the balance shall be refunded to the plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32417.

In any judgment, interest shall be allowed at the modified adjusted rate per annum established pursuant to Section 6591.5, upon the amount found to have been illegally collected from the date of payment of the amount to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1020, Sec. 43.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

32418.

A judgment shall not be rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any action brought against the board to recover any tax paid when the action is brought by or in the name of an assignee of the taxpayer paying the tax or by any person other than the person who has paid the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [32431. - 32433.]

32431.

(a) The Controller may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California.

(b) As an alternative to subdivision (a), the board may recover any refund or part thereof that is erroneously made, and any credit or part thereof that is erroneously allowed. In recovering
 any erroneous refund or credit, the board may, in its discretion, issue a deficiency determination in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 32271) or Article 5 (commencing with Section 32311) of Chapter 6. Except in the case of fraud, the deficiency determination shall be made by the board within three years from the date of the Controller’s warrant or date of credit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 609, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

32432.
